Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,123
Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act; complaint; applicability.

The Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Education Act does not prohibit a person asserting a claim for discrimination in employment or the conditions thereof from filing a complaint pursuant to the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act. Filing a complaint pursuant to the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act constitutes a waiver of any right to seek relief pursuant to the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Education Act, and filing a complaint pursuant to the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Education Act constitutes a waiver of any right to seek relief pursuant to the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act.

Laws 1982, LB 628, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3010;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 127.

Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act, see section 48-1125.